Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.436

Cancellation of license to distribute or of registration—Refusal to register if fraudulent or deceptive practices used—Opportunity for hearing.

The department may cancel the license to distribute commercial fertilizer or registration of any commercial fertilizer product or refuse to license a distributor or register any commercial fertilizer product as provided in this chapter due to:

(1) An incomplete or insufficient license or registration application;

(2) The misbranding or adulteration of a commercial fertilizer; or

(3) A violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

If the department cancels or refuses to renew an existing license or registration due to the misbranding or adulteration of a commercial fertilizer or due to a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted hereunder, the licensee/registrant or applicant may request a hearing as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1998 c 36 s 10; 1993 c 183 s 12; 1987 c 45 s 24.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.